Utah statutes.
63E-2-110.   Budgetary and fiscal requirements.
(1)  The board of each independent corporation shall annually adopt a budget.
(2) (a)  All monies held in trust by an independent corporation are not public
funds, even if they were public funds before those monies were received by the
independent corporation.
(b)  The monies of an independent corporation are not required to be held in
the custody of the state treasurer.
